Utah statutes.
48-2e-402.   General partner agent of limited partnership.

(1)  Each general partner is an agent of the limited partnership for the purposes of its activities and affairs.  An act of a general partner, including the signing of a record in the limited partnership's name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the limited partnership's activities and affairs or activities and affairs of the kind carried on by the limited partnership binds the limited partnership, unless the general partner did not have authority to act for the limited partnership in the particular matter and the person with which the general partner was dealing knew or had notice that the general partner lacked authority.

(2)  An act of a general partner which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the limited partnership's activities and affairs or activities and affairs of the kind carried on by the limited partnership binds the limited partnership only if the act was actually authorized by all the other partners.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

